Florida, session 2026, SB972.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 21 22 Section 1.âSection 468.3711, Florida Statutes, is created 23 to read: 24 468.3711âRespiratory Care Interstate Compact Commission; 25 public meetings and public records exemptions.â 26 (1)âA respiratory therapistâs personal identifying 27 information, other than his or her name, licensure status, or 28 licensure number, obtained from the data system described in 29 Art. VIII of s. 468.371 and held by the department or the board 30 is exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 31 Constitution unless the state that originally reported the 32 information to the data system authorizes the disclosure of such 33 information by law. If disclosure is so authorized, such 34 information may be disclosed only to the extent authorized by 35 the law of the reporting state. 36 (2)(a)âAny meeting or a portion of a meeting of the 37 Respiratory Care Interstate Compact Commission or the executive 38 committee of the commission established in Art. VII of s. 39 468.371 at which certain sensitive and confidential matters, as 40 specified in subsection (6) of Art. VII of s. 468.371, are 41 discussed is exempt from s. 286.011 and s. 24(b), Art. I of the 42 State Constitution. 43 (b)âRecordings, minutes, and records generated during an 44 exempt meeting or exempt portion of a meeting are exempt from s. 45 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 46 (3)âThis section is subject to the Open Government Sunset 47 Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed 48 on October 2, 2031, unless reviewed and saved from repeal 49 through reenactment by the Legislature. 50 Section 2.â(1)âThe Legislature finds that it is a public 51 necessity that a respiratory therapistâs personal identifying 52 information, other than his or her name, licensure status, or 53 licensure number, obtained from the data system described in 54 Article VIII of s. 468.371, Florida Statutes, and held by the 55 Department of Health or the Board of Respiratory Care be made 56 confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and 57 s. 24(a), Article I of the State Constitution. The personal 58 identifying information of a respiratory therapist should be 59 protected from public disclosure. Protection of such information 60 is required under the Respiratory Care Interstate Compact. 61 Without the public records exemption, this state will be unable 62 to effectively implement and administer the compact. 63 (2)(a)âThe Legislature further finds that it is a public 64 necessity that any meeting of the Respiratory Care Interstate 65 Compact Commission or the executive committee of the commission, 66 as provided in s. 468.371, Florida Statutes, at which matters 67 specifically exempted from disclosure by federal or state law 68 are discussed be made exempt from s. 286.011, Florida Statutes, 69 and s. 24(b), Article I of the State Constitution. 70 (b)âThe Respiratory Care Interstate Compact requires the 71 closure of any meeting, or portion of a meeting, of the 72 Respiratory Care Interstate Compact Commission or the executive 73 committee of the commission, if the presiding officer states in 74 a public meeting that the commission or the executive committee 75 of the commission must discuss certain sensitive and 76 confidential matters as specified in subsection (6) of Article 77 VII of s. 468.371, Florida Statutes. In the absence of a public 78 meetings exemption, this state would be prohibited from becoming 79 a member state of the compact. 80 (3)âThe Legislature further finds that it is a public 81 necessity that the recordings, minutes, and records generated 82 during a meeting held as provided in s. 468.371, Florida 83 Statutes, which are exempt from public meetings requirements be 84 made exempt from s. 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), 85 Article I of the State Constitution. Release of such information 86 would negate the public meetings exemption. As such, the 87 Legislature finds that the public records exemption is a public 88 necessity. 89 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect on the same date that 90 SB 970 or similar legislation takes effect, if such legislation 91 is adopted in the same legislative session or an extension 92 thereof and becomes a law.